Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2152
Utilities district; elections; procedure.

The elections provided for in sections 14-2102, 14-2120, 14-2142, and 14-2157 shall be held according to the Election Act.

Laws 1913, c. 143, § 19, p. 360;

R.S.1913, § 4261;

C.S.1922, § 3764;

C.S.1929, § 14-1020;

R.S.1943, § 14-1030;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1030;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 52;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 479.

Election Act, see section 32-101.